Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.151

Exemptions from licensing. (Effective until January 1, 2028.)

This chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Any person who purchases or disposes of property and/or a business opportunity for that individual's own account, or that of a group of which the person is a member, and their employees;

(2) Any duly authorized attorney-in-fact acting under a power of attorney without compensation;

(3) An attorney-at-law in the performance of the practice of law;

(4) Any receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, executor, administrator, guardian, personal representative, or any person acting under the order of any court, selling under a deed of trust, or acting as trustee under a trust;

(5) Any secretary, bookkeeper, accountant, or other office personnel who does not engage in any conduct or activity specified in any of the definitions under RCW 18.85.011;

(6) Employees of towns, cities, counties, or governmental entities involved in an acquisition of property for right-of-way, eminent domain, or threat of eminent domain;

(7) Only with respect to the rental or lease of individual storage space, any person who owns or manages a self-service storage facility as defined under chapter 19.150 RCW;

(8) Any person providing referrals to licensees who is not involved in the negotiation, execution of documents, or related real estate brokerage services, and compensation is not contingent upon receipt of compensation by the licensee or the real estate firm;

(9) Certified public accountants if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest;

(10) Any natural persons or entities including title or escrow companies, escrow agents, attorneys, or financial institutions acting as escrow agents if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest;

(11) Investment counselors if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest;

(12) Common interest community managers who, in an advisory capacity and for compensation or in expectation of compensation, provide management or financial services, negotiate agreements to provide management or financial services, or represent themselves as providing management or financial services to an association governed by chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW, if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest. This subsection (12) applies regardless of whether a common interest community manager acts as an independent contractor to, employee of, general manager or executive director of, or agent of an association governed by chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW; and

(13) Any person employed or retained by, for, or on behalf of the owner or on behalf of a designated or managing broker if the person is limited in property management to any of the following activities:

(a) Delivering a lease application, a lease, or any amendment thereof to any person;

(b) Receiving a lease application, lease, or amendment thereof, a security deposit, rental payment, or any related payment for delivery to and made payable to the real estate firm or owner;

(c) Showing a rental unit to any person, or executing leases or rental agreements, and the employee or retainee is acting under the direct instruction of the owner or designated or managing broker;

(d) Providing information about a rental unit, a lease, an application for lease, or a security deposit and rental amounts to any prospective tenant; or

(e) Assisting in the performance of property management functions by carrying out administrative, clerical, financial, or maintenance tasks.

[ 2012 c 126 s 1; 2008 c 23 s 16; 1997 c 322 s 7; 1989 c 161 s 1; 1988 c 240 s 20; 1977 ex.s. c 370 s 9; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 10; 1951 c 222 s 9; 1941 c 252 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-26. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 4. Formerly RCW 18.85.110.]

PDFRCW 18.85.151

Exemptions from licensing. (Effective January 1, 2028.)

This chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Any person who purchases or disposes of property and/or a business opportunity for that individual's own account, or that of a group of which the person is a member, and their employees;

(2) Any duly authorized attorney-in-fact acting under a power of attorney without compensation;

(3) An attorney-at-law in the performance of the practice of law;

(4) Any receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, executor, administrator, guardian, personal representative, or any person acting under the order of any court, selling under a deed of trust, or acting as trustee under a trust;

(5) Any secretary, bookkeeper, accountant, or other office personnel who does not engage in any conduct or activity specified in any of the definitions under RCW 18.85.011;

(6) Employees of towns, cities, counties, or governmental entities involved in an acquisition of property for right-of-way, eminent domain, or threat of eminent domain;

(7) Only with respect to the rental or lease of individual storage space, any person who owns or manages a self-service storage facility as defined under chapter 19.150 RCW;

(8) Any person providing referrals to licensees who is not involved in the negotiation, execution of documents, or related real estate brokerage services, and compensation is not contingent upon receipt of compensation by the licensee or the real estate firm;

(9) Certified public accountants if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest;

(10) Any natural persons or entities including title or escrow companies, escrow agents, attorneys, or financial institutions acting as escrow agents if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest;

(11) Investment counselors if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest;

(12) Common interest community managers who, in an advisory capacity and for compensation or in expectation of compensation, provide management or financial services, negotiate agreements to provide management or financial services, or represent themselves as providing management or financial services to an association governed by chapter 64.90 RCW, if they do not promote the purchase, listing, sale, exchange, optioning, leasing, or renting of a specific real property interest. This subsection (12) applies regardless of whether a common interest community manager acts as an independent contractor to, employee of, general manager or executive director of, or agent of an association governed by chapter 64.90 RCW; and

(13) Any person employed or retained by, for, or on behalf of the owner or on behalf of a designated or managing broker if the person is limited in property management to any of the following activities:

(a) Delivering a lease application, a lease, or any amendment thereof to any person;

(b) Receiving a lease application, lease, or amendment thereof, a security deposit, rental payment, or any related payment for delivery to and made payable to the real estate firm or owner;

(c) Showing a rental unit to any person, or executing leases or rental agreements, and the employee or retainee is acting under the direct instruction of the owner or designated or managing broker;

(d) Providing information about a rental unit, a lease, an application for lease, or a security deposit and rental amounts to any prospective tenant; or

(e) Assisting in the performance of property management functions by carrying out administrative, clerical, financial, or maintenance tasks.

[ 2024 c 321 s 403; 2012 c 126 s 1; 2008 c 23 s 16; 1997 c 322 s 7; 1989 c 161 s 1; 1988 c 240 s 20; 1977 ex.s. c 370 s 9; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 10; 1951 c 222 s 9; 1941 c 252 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-26. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 4. Formerly RCW 18.85.110.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 321 ss 319 and 401-432: See note following RCW 64.90.485.